Arkansas, session 2025, HB1203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-52-203 is amended to read as follows:
26-52-203. Fee deposit or bond Fee prohibited — Bond required.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall not require prior to the issuance of any the payment of a fee as a
condition of issuing a new Arkansas gross receipts tax permit the payment of
a nonrefundable fee of fifty dollars ($50.00), which shall be remitted with
each new application for a permit.
(b)(1) All persons doing a retail business in this state, which
business is subject to the provisions of this chapter, who do not have a
permanent domicile in this state, shall make a sufficient cash deposit or
sufficient bond with the secretary to cover their annual sales tax before
doing business in this state or before receiving a permit to do business in
this state as provided in § 26-52-201.
(c) All revenues derived from the fees imposed by (2) Funds
received under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be deposited into the
State Treasury as nonrevenue receipts credited to the State Central Services
Fund for use by the Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and
*JLL051*
01/22/2025 10:57:24 AM JLL051

HB1203
Administration.



































01/22/2025 10:57:24 AM JLL051